Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-529
Sections, how construed.

It is declared that sections 81-501.01 to 81-531 and 81-5,151 to 81-5,157 are in nature necessary for the public safety, health, peace, and welfare and shall be liberally construed.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 28, p. 490;

C.S.1929, § 81-5528;

R.S.1943, § 81-529;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 84.